District of Columbia statutes.
16-1315

Distribution of money deposited on declaration of taking; judgment for deficiency or overpayment; execution.

After the filing of the declaration of taking, and the deposit of the money in the registry of the court, as provided for by section 16-1314 , the court, upon the application of the parties in interest, may order that the money so deposited, or any part thereof, be paid forthwith for or on account of the just compensation to be awarded in the proceeding. Upon the final award of compensation, the court shall enter judgment for the amount of any deficiency or overpayment in the manner provided by subdivision (j) of rule 71A of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure. A writ of execution may be issued on the judgment within the same time, and it shall have the same effect as a lien, and shall be executed and returned in the same manner, as if issued on any other judgment.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 573, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1315.
1973 Ed., § 16-1315.